Utah statutes.
49-13-104.   Creation of trust fund.
(1)  There is created the "Public Employees' Noncontributory Retirement Trust
Fund" for the purpose of paying the benefits and costs of administering this
system.
(2)  The fund shall consist of all money paid into it, including interest, in
accordance with this chapter, whether in the form of cash, securities, or
other assets, and of all money received from any other source.
(3)  Custody, management, and investment of the fund shall be governed by
Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration.
